Nevada, session 83, SB445.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall, not later than 1 year after a pupil
graduates from a high school or otherwise ceases enrollment in a
public school in this State, transfer any data concerning the pupil
to an archive of data concerning pupils that is maintained by the
Department. Any personally identifiable information, not
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
including the birth date of the pupil, must be redacted from any
data concerning the pupil before being transferred to the archive.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 239.080 and
378.320, the Department shall, 10 years after a pupil whose data
was transferred pursuant to subsection 1 reaches 22 years of age,
destroy the data.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Data” means any data concerning a pupil that is collected
by, or provided to, the Department pursuant to NRS 385A.800,
385A.810 or 385A.820, including, without limitation, a number
assigned to a pupil as part of a system of unique identification of
each pupil.
(b) “Personally identifiable information” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 34 C.F.R. § 99.3.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)